Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.084

Duty to report infection or exposure to disease—Unlawful conduct.

Any person owning or having in his or her control any livestock which become infected with scrapie or another transmissible spongiform encephalopathy (TSE) or which have been exposed to such disease, shall immediately report the disease or exposure to the director. It is unlawful for any person to fail to report or to attempt to conceal the existence of any such disease.

[ 1998 c 8 s 15; 1927 c 165 s 28; RRS s 3137. Prior: See Reviser's note to RCW 16.44.020. Formerly RCW 16.44.140.]